District of Columbia statutes.
47-1277

Rules.

The Mayor, in consultation with the Department of Health and ICF-IDD and employee representatives, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-68, § 2(b), 53 DCR 47
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 33(b)(10), 59 DCR 5567
This section is referenced in § 47-1274, § 47-1275, § 47-1276, and § 47-1278.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “ICF-IDD” for “ICF-MR.”
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.